California statutes. Water Code
(a) Except as otherwise provided in a general obligation bond act, the maximum amount that may be allocated for administrative expenses shall not exceed 5 percent of the total amount of funds that the department is required to administer and that are derived from a general obligation bond act that is approved on or after January 1, 2007.

(b) The maximum amount that may be allocated for administrative expenses shall not exceed 5 percent of the total amount of funds that result from the sale of revenue bonds by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 831, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

139.2.

The department shall evaluate the potential impacts on water supplies derived from the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta based on 50-, 100-, and 200-year projections for each of the following possible impacts on the delta:

(1) Subsidence.

(2) Earthquakes.

(3) Floods.

(4) Changes in precipitation, temperature, and ocean levels.

(5) A combination of the impacts specified in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 573, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

139.4.

(a) The department and the Department of Fish and Game shall determine the principal options for the delta.

(b) The department shall evaluate and comparatively rate each option determined in subdivision (a) for its ability to do the following:

(1) Prevent the disruption of water supplies derived from the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta.

(2) Improve the quality of drinking water supplies derived from the delta.

(3) Reduce the amount of salts contained in delta water and delivered to, and often retained in, our agricultural areas.

(4) Maintain delta water quality for delta users.

(5) Assist in preserving delta lands.

(6) Protect water rights of the “area of origin” and protect the environments of the Sacramento-San Joaquin river systems.

(7) Protect highways, utility facilities, and other infrastructure located within the delta.

(8) Preserve, protect, and improve delta levees.

(c) The Department of Fish and Game shall evaluate and comparatively rate each option determined in subdivision (a) for its ability to restore salmon and other fisheries that use the San Francisco Bay/Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Estuary.

(d) On or before January 1, 2008, the department and the Department of Fish and Game shall jointly report to the Legislature and Governor, in writing, with regard to the results of the evaluation required by Section 139.2 and the comparative ratings required by subdivisions (b) and (c).

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 573, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

140.

(a) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, which shall not exceed seven million dollars ($7,000,000), the department shall provide funding for a project that substantially conforms to the
 project description for the Reverse Flow Pump-back Facilities on the Friant-Kern Canal Restoration Project set forth by the draft investment strategy released by the San Joaquin River Restoration Program in December 2014 if the project satisfies the conditions described in subdivision (c).

(b) Funding pursuant to this section shall not exceed 80 percent of the total cost of the project.

(c) The project identified in this section shall not be eligible for funding pursuant to subdivision (a) until all of the following requirements are met:

(1) All feasibility studies are complete and draft environmental impact reports are available for public review.

(2) The director receives commitments for not less than 75 percent of the nonstate cost-share requirement of the project.

(d) A project funded pursuant to this section shall comply with any other applicable provisions of state and federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 601, Sec. 1.   (AB 935)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

141.

(a) The department may establish a program to authorize private entities to lease space above or adjacent to appropriate conveyance facilities of the State Water Project for the purpose of installing solar photovoltaic panels and systems for generating electricity from those panels and transferring electricity through the related systems. Upon request, the department shall evaluate proposals for installing solar photovoltaic panels and related systems for the generation and transfer of electricity. A proposal submitted to the department for evaluation shall include, but need not be limited to, an engineering study of the proposed solar photovoltaic panels and related systems and an evaluation of the effect the solar photovoltaic panels and related systems may have on water supply, water quality, worker safety, and liability considerations. The costs of the engineering study and the department’s evaluation shall be paid by the person or entity making the request.

(b) After approval of a proposal as described in subdivision (a), the department may negotiate any level of compensation for an agreement for the installation of solar photovoltaic panels and related systems that is equal to, or greater than, the cost to the department of meeting its obligations under the agreement. These costs shall include, but are not limited to, the costs of operating and maintaining State Water Project facilities and lease administration that are directly related to the lease and use of the conveyance facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 368, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

141.5.

The department shall proceed with the construction of the South Delta Improvements Program, but shall not commence the operational phase of the program until the director certifies, in writing, to the Legislature that the department has completed the operational studies of the project and that the environmental review required by the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) includes a comparison between the implementation of the program and the maintenance of current operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 77, Sec. 59.   Effective July 18, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

142.

(a) In order to reduce greenhouse gas emissions associated with water and energy usage, on and after January 1, 2008, the department shall do all of the following:

(1) Comply with the same greenhouse gas emissions performance standards adopted pursuant to Section 8341 of the Public Utilities Code for a local publicly owned electric utility for new electricity contracts.

(2) Use reasonable, feasible, and cost-effective efforts to use energy efficiently, and to increase use of renewable energy in the department’s water operations and in the renegotiation of existing electricity contracts entered into pursuant to Division 27 (commencing with Section 80000).

(b) On or before March 1, 2008, and at least once every year thereafter until December 31, 2015, the department shall report to the Legislature and the Governor on the implementation of this section, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The status of any contracts it has for fossil fuel generated electricity and its efforts to reduce its dependency on fossil fuels.

(2) Changes to the portfolio of existing energy contracts entered into pursuant to Division 27 (commencing with Section 80000) that have occurred, or are expected to occur, that will alter the contracts’ costs, term, or quantity, or the composition of resources used to deliver power under the contracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 178, Sec. 19.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

144.

(a) Upon an appropriation of funds by the Legislature for the purposes of this section, the department and the board shall develop a plan to deploy a network of stream gages that includes a determination of funding needs and opportunities for modernizing and reactivating existing gages and deploying new gages in priority locations across hydrologic regions in the state, including reference sites. 

(b) The department and the board, in consultation with the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the Department of Conservation, the Central Valley Flood Protection Board, interested stakeholders, and, to the extent they wish to consult, local agencies, shall develop the plan to address significant gaps in information necessary for
 water management and the conservation of freshwater species. 

(c) This section does not expand the authority of the board or the department to require the installation or modification of a stream gage.

(d) The department and the board shall give priority in the plan to placing or modernizing and reactivating stream gages where lack of data contributes to conflicts in water management or where water can be more effectively managed for multiple benefits, including, but not limited to, the following benefits:

(1) Water supply management.

(2) Flood management.

(3) Water quality management.

(4) Ecosystem management.

(e) Other criteria to be considered by the department and the board in developing the plan include all of the following:

(1) Opportunities for local agencies to enter cost-share arrangements to install or maintain the stream gage.

(2) Ease of integrating the stream gage into the existing network.

(3) Availability of historic gage data for specific locations.

(4) Availability of temperature data for specific locations. 

(5) Degree of water quality and flow impacts related to cannabis cultivation. 

(6) Integration with the Open and Transparent Water Data Act (Part 4.9 (commencing with Section 12400) of Division 6). 

(7) Ability to provide data to assist with groundwater management.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

147.

(a) On or before January 10, 2010, and annually thereafter, the department shall prepare and submit to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees of the Legislature a report with regard to the budget for the State Water Resources Development System.

(b) The department shall include in the report all of the following information:

(1) A description of the expenditures made, or projected to be made, as applicable, on behalf of the State Water Resources Development System, by program and fund, and of the total revenues expended, or projected to be expended, as applicable, for that system, including each fund source.

(2) A description of the positions within the department that carry out functions related to the State Water Resources Development System, and the total number of those positions.

(3) A description of any funds, other than funds generated by the State Water Resources Development System, that are expended, or projected to be expended, as applicable, for the State Water Resources Development System, including those funds used for cost-sharing purposes.

(4) An itemization of all contracts related to the Bay-Delta Conservation Plan financed, or projected to be financed, as applicable, in full or in part with funds generated by the State Water Resources Development System, including the dollar amount of those contracts and a brief description of the purposes of those contracts.

(c) The department shall include in each report information relating to three fiscal years that include the two completed fiscal years that immediately precede the year in which the report is due, along with applicable information for the fiscal year in which the report is due. The department shall prepare the first report required under subdivision (a) for the 2007–08, 2008–09, and 2009–10 fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 11, Sec. 27.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

147.1.

(a) By August 1 of each year, the department shall prepare and submit to the Legislature, and post on the department’s internet website, a detailed accounting for each public works project undertaken by the department using the project delivery methods authorized by Article 1.1 (commencing with Section 10112) and Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 10200) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. The accounting shall include all of the following:

(1) The total number of state-employed staff, including engineers and related positions, utilized by the department to design, inspect, and manage the project.

(2) The average annual cost per state staff position utilized to perform work related to the project in the applicable fiscal years. In calculating the total and per-state-staff cost, the department shall use staff salaries and benefits, and other direct costs that can be attributed solely to the performance of state staff services, that would otherwise be incurred by the department.

(3) The total number of consultant personnel year-equivalent consultant positions utilized by the department to design, construct, and manage the project.

(4) The average, annual, per personnel year-equivalent cost of consultant positions utilized to perform work related to the project in the applicable fiscal year. In calculating the total and per-consultant cost to the department of utilizing
 a personnel-year equivalent consulting position, the department shall use the cost of procuring the services under the contract, including the price of the contract, the cost to the department of negotiating and awarding the contract, and the cost to the department of supervising, monitoring, and overseeing the services to be performed under the contract.

(5) A list of all department contracts issued, for a project described in this subdivision, for the two completed fiscal years that immediately precede the year in which the report is due, along with an estimate for the fiscal year in which the report is due. This shall include all of the following:

(A) The dollar amount of the contract.

(B) A brief
 description of the purpose of the contract.

(C) The estimated timeline for completion of the project.

(b) The accounting to be submitted to the Legislature pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2034, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 247, Sec. 5.   (SB 626)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

147.3.

(a) (1) The department shall conduct a voluntary statewide survey of local regional water supply projects and post the results of the
 survey on the department’s Internet Web site by July 1, 2015.

(2) For purposes of complying with paragraph (1), the department may use any other survey that it conducted in conjunction with other agencies or third parties.

(b) The survey information posted on the department’s Internet Web site pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The projected date for a project to complete the permit process and subsequently commence operations.

(2) The cost of the project.

(3) The projected additional acre feet of water realized on an annual basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 838, Sec. 1.   (SB 1120)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

147.5.

At least 60 days prior to the final approval of the renewal or extension of a long-term water supply contract between the department and a state water project contractor, the department shall present at an informational hearing before the Legislature the details of the terms and conditions of the contract and how they serve as a template for the remaining long-term water supply contracts. This presentation shall be made to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and relevant policy and fiscal committees of both houses, as determined by the Speaker of the Assembly and the Senate Committee on Rules. The department shall submit a copy of one long-term contract to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee no less than 30 days prior to the scheduled
 hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 39, Sec. 114.   (SB 1018)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

148.

(a) The department shall perform construction inspection services for all water resources projects authorized pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 10187) and Article 1.1 (commencing with Section 10112) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. The department shall use department employees or consultants under contract with the department to perform the services described in this section, consistent with Article XXII of the California Constitution. Construction inspection services performed by the department for those projects include, but are not limited to, material source testing, certification testing, monitoring of environmental compliance, independent quality control testing and
 inspection, and quality assurance audits. The construction inspection duties and responsibilities of the department shall include a direct reporting relationship between the inspectors and senior department engineers responsible for all inspectors and construction inspection services. The senior department engineer responsible for construction inspection services shall be responsible for the acceptance or rejection of the work.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall retain the authority to stop the contractor’s operation wholly or in part and take appropriate action when public safety is jeopardized on a water resources-related project authorized pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 10187) and Article 1.1 (commencing with Section 10112) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. The
 department shall ensure that public safety and convenience is maintained whenever work is performed under an encroachment permit on state property or within the state right-of-way. The department shall regularly inspect the job sites for safety compliance and any possible deficiencies. If any deficiency is observed, the department shall issue a written notice and the deficiency shall be corrected and documented.

(c) “Construction inspection services” as used in this section shall not include surveying work performed as part of a Construction Manager/General Contractor or design-build contract.

(d) If any provision or application of this section is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the department shall post on its internet website within 10 business days of the decision
 of invalidity that this section has been held invalid.

(e) This section is severable. If any provision of this section or the remainder of this article, or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2033, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 247, Sec. 6.   (SB 626)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. California Water Commission [150. - 166.]

150.

There is in the Department of Water Resources the California Water Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

151.

The California Water Commission consists of nine members who are appointed by the Governor subject to the confirmation of the Senate, as provided in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2112.)
-------------------------------------------

152.

Seven members of the California Water Commission appointed by the Governor shall be selected and approved for appointment on the basis of their general educational and business qualifications, and their knowledge of, interest in, and experience with problems relating to the control, storage, and beneficial use of water. They shall be appointed in such a manner as to afford representation on the commission of all parts of the state so far as it is practicable. In considering qualifications of such members of the commission, engineering ability and experience shall be deemed advisable. Two members of the commission appointed by the Governor shall be members of the public having an interest in and knowledge of the environment and need have none of the other qualifications specified in this section. The next two members appointed to the commission by the Governor after the effective date of the amendment of this section at the 1970 Regular Session of the Legislature shall be members of the public having such interest in and knowledge of the environment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1437.)
-------------------------------------------

153.

(a) The terms of the members of the California Water Commission in office as of January 1, 1958, shall expire as follows:

(1) One member on January 15, 1958.

(2) Two members on January 15, 1959.

(3) Two members on January 15, 1960.

(4) Two members on January 15, 1961.

(b) The terms of the two additional members of the commission provided for by Chapter 2112 of the Statutes of 1959 shall expire as follows:

(1) One member on January 15, 1962.

(2) One member on January 15, 1963.

(c) The terms of the successors to the members shall be for four years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 125, Sec. 1.   (AB 1260)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

153.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 153 and 154, the term of any member of the California Water Commission, whose appointment has been confirmed by the Senate and who is serving a term that is unexpired as of January 1, 2011, shall expire on May 14, 2014.

(b) Commencing May 14, 2014, members shall be appointed to the unexpired terms succeeding to the terms specified in Section 153.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 125, Sec. 2.   (AB 1260)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

154.

Appointments shall be for terms of four years. Vacancies shall be immediately filled by the Governor for the unexpired portion of the terms in which they occur.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

155.

The appointments made by the Governor to membership on the California Water Commission shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate at the next regular or special session of the Legislature and the refusal or failure of the Senate to confirm an appointment shall create a vacancy in the office to which the appointment was made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1941.)
-------------------------------------------

156.

The members of the California Water Commission may be removed from office by the Legislature, by concurrent resolution adopted by a majority vote of all members elected to each house, for dereliction of duty or corruption or incompetency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1941.)
-------------------------------------------

157.

Each member of the California Water Commission shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) for each day during which the member is engaged in the performance of official duties, but shall not be compensated for more than 40 days in any one fiscal year, except that the chairperson of the commission may be compensated for up to 60 days for performance of those duties. In addition to that compensation, each member shall be reimbursed for necessary traveling and other expenses incurred in the performance of official duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 796, Sec. 3.   Effective September 18, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

158.

The California Water Commission shall maintain its headquarters at Sacramento and shall hold meetings at such times and at such places as shall be determined by it. All meetings of the commission shall be open and public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1941.)
-------------------------------------------

159.

Special meetings may be called at any time by the chairman or by the executive officer at the request of any four members, upon notice specifying the matters to be acted upon at such meeting, but no other matters shall be acted upon at special meetings which were not so noticed, unless all members are present and consent thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1041.)
-------------------------------------------

160.

The members of the California Water Commission shall select one of the members to serve as chairman, who shall hold office as chairman at the pleasure of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1941.)
-------------------------------------------

161.

The California Water Commission shall confer with, advise, and make recommendations to the director with respect to any matters and subjects under his jurisdiction. The rulemaking power of the department shall be exercised in the following manner. All rules and regulations of the department, other than those relating exclusively to the internal administration and management of the department, shall be first presented by the director to the commission and shall become effective only upon approval thereof by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1941.)
-------------------------------------------

161.5.

The California Water Commission shall have the power to name all facilities of the State Water Resources Development System owned by the state. The commission may receive testimony from the public on matters involving its responsibilities under this section, and, after public hearing for the purpose of considering all proposed names for such facilities, may, by resolution, express its decision regarding the naming of specific facilities of the State Water Resources Development System.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1486.)
-------------------------------------------

162.

It is the intention of the Legislature that in the making of all major departmental determinations, policies and procedures, such as departmental recommendations to the Legislature, the director and the California Water Commission shall be in agreement whenever possible; but for the purpose of fixing responsibility to the Governor and to the Legislature, in the event of disagreement between the director and the commission upon such matters, the views of the director shall prevail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 180.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

163.

The commission may employ an executive officer, exempt from civil service, under subdivision (e) of Section 4 of Article XXIV of the Constitution, and a staff engineer from the staff of the department who shall be responsible to the commission. The commission may also employ such clerical assistants as may be necessary for the proper discharge of its duties and may purchase or rent necessary supplies, instruments, tools, equipment and conveniences.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

163.5.

The department shall furnish to the California Water Commission, at its request, such assistance, including technical, legal, and clerical services, as is required to the extent funds are made available therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1041.)
-------------------------------------------

164.

The commission may hold any hearings and conduct any investigations in any part of the state necessary to carry out the powers vested in it, and for such purposes has the powers conferred upon heads of departments of the state by Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180), Chapter 2, Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code.

Any hearing or investigation by the commission may be conducted by any member or nominee upon authorization of the commission, and he shall have the powers granted to the commission by this section, but any final action of the commission shall be taken by a majority of the members of the commission at a meeting duly called and held.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1656.)
-------------------------------------------

165.

The California Water Commission shall conduct an annual review of the progress of construction and operation of the State Water Resources Development System, and shall make a report on its findings to the department and to the Legislature, together with whatever recommendations it deems appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

166.

The California Water Commission shall hold public hearings on all additional facilities proposed to be added to the State Water Resources Development System by the department pursuant to the authority granted by Sections 12931 and 12938.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. State Water Resources Control Board [174. - 189.7.]

174.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that in order to provide for the orderly and efficient administration of the water resources of the state, it is necessary to establish a control board that shall exercise the adjudicatory and regulatory functions of the state in the field of water resources.

(b) It is also the intention of the Legislature to combine the water rights, water quality, and drinking water functions of the state government to provide for coordinated consideration of water rights, water quality, and safe and reliable drinking water.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1,
 2014.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 181) and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 35, Sec. 182.   (SB 861)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

175.

(a) There is in the California Environmental Protection Agency the State Water Resources Control Board consisting of five members appointed by the Governor. One of the members appointed shall be an attorney admitted to practice law in this state who is qualified in the fields of water supply and water rights, one shall be a registered civil engineer under the laws of this state who is qualified in the fields of water supply and water rights, one shall be a registered professional engineer under the laws of this state who is experienced in sanitary engineering and who is qualified in the field of water quality, and one shall be qualified in the field of water quality. One of the above-appointed persons, in addition to having the specified
 qualifications, shall be qualified in the field of water supply and water quality relating to irrigated agriculture. One member shall not be required to have specialized experience.

(b) Each member shall represent the state at large and not any particular portion thereof and shall serve full time. The board shall, to the extent possible, be composed of members from different regions of the state. The appointments made by the Governor shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate in accordance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 1770) of Chapter 4 of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 288, Sec. 2.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

175.5.

(a) A member of the board shall not participate in any board action pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 13320) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 in which the board member has a disqualifying financial interest in the decision within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(b) A board member shall not participate in any proceeding before any regional board as a consultant or in any other capacity on behalf of any waste discharger.

(c) Upon the request of any person, or on the Attorney General’s own initiative, the Attorney General may file a complaint in the superior court for the county in which the
 board has its principal office alleging that a board member has knowingly violated this section and the facts upon which the allegation is based and asking that the member be removed from office. Further proceedings shall be in accordance as near as may be with rules governing civil actions. If after trial the court finds that the board member has knowingly violated this section it shall pronounce judgment that the member be removed from office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 39, Sec. 115.   (SB 1018)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

176.

The annual salary of the members of the board is provided for by Chapter 6 (commencing at Section 11550) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Each member of the board shall receive the necessary traveling and other expenses incurred by him in the performance of his official duties out of appropriations made for the support of the board. When necessary the members of the board may travel within or without the State.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 186 by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

177.

All members of the board shall be appointed for terms of four years. Vacancies shall be immediately filled by the Governor for the unexpired portion of the terms in which they occur.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 40, Sec. 2.   Effective May 26, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

178.

The members of the board may be removed from office by the Legislature, by concurrent resolution adopted by a majority vote of all members elected to each house, for dereliction of duty or corruption or incompetency.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 188 by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

179.

The board succeeds to and is vested with all of the powers, duties, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction vested in the Department and Director of Public Works, the Division of Water Resources of the Department of Public Works, the State Engineer, the State Water Quality Control Board, or any officer or employee thereof, under Division 2 (commencing with Section 1000), except Part 4 (commencing with Section 4000) and Part 6 (commencing with Section 5900) thereof; and Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000) of this code, or any other law under which permits or licenses to appropriate water are issued, denied, or revoked or under which the functions of water pollution and quality control are exercised.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

179.6.

The board, or representatives authorized by the board to do so, may call, conduct or attend conferences or hearings, official or unofficial, within or without this state, or otherwise participate in such conferences or hearings with interested persons, agencies or officers, of this or any other state, or with the Congress of the United States, congressional committees, or officers of the federal government, concerning any matter within the scope of the power and duties of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

179.7.

As to any matter involving the United States, its departments or agencies, which is within the scope of the power and duties of the board, the board may represent the interest of the state or any county, city, state agency or public district upon their request, and to that end may correspond, confer and cooperate with the United States, its departments or agencies, and where necessary the board members, or authorized representatives, may travel either within or without the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

181.

The board shall maintain its headquarters at Sacramento and may establish branch offices in such parts of the state as the board deems necessary. The board shall hold meetings at such times and at such places as shall be determined by it. The Governor shall designate the time and place for the first meeting of the board. Three members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of transacting any business of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1656.)
-------------------------------------------

182.

The Governor shall designate the chairperson of the board from the membership of the board. The person so designated shall hold the office of chairperson at the pleasure of the Governor. The board shall elect a vice chairperson.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 288, Sec. 3.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

183.

The board may hold any hearings and conduct any investigations in any part of the state necessary to carry out the powers vested in it, and for such purposes has the powers conferred upon heads of departments of the state by Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180), Chapter 2, Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code.

Any hearing or investigation by the board may be conducted by any member upon authorization of the board, and he shall have the powers granted to the board by this section, but any final action of the board shall be taken by a majority of all the members of the board, at a meeting duly called and held.

All hearings held by the board or by any member thereof shall be open and public

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1288.)
-------------------------------------------

184.

The Department of Water Resources shall have an interest and may appear as a party in any hearing held by the board and may commence or appear in any judicial proceeding brought to inquire into the validity of any action, order, or decision of the board.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 194 by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

185.

The board shall adopt rules for the conduct of its affairs in conformity, as nearly as practicable, with the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 184.)
-------------------------------------------

186.

(a) The board shall have any powers, and may employ any legal counsel and other personnel and assistance, that may be necessary or convenient for the exercise of its duties authorized by law.

(b) For the purpose of administration, the board shall organize itself, with the approval of the Governor, in the manner it deems necessary properly to segregate and conduct the work of the board. The work of the board shall be divided into at least two divisions, known as the Division of Water Rights and the Division of Water Quality. The board shall appoint a deputy director or division chief for each division, who shall supervise the work of the division and act as technical adviser to the
 board on functions under his or her jurisdiction.
